Maine, session 132, LD1545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 18-C MRSA §3-1201, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A,
§2 and affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
A. The value of the entire estate, wherever located, less liens and encumbrances, does
not exceed $40,000, adjusted for inflation pursuant to section 1-108;
Sec. 2. 18-C MRSA §3-1201, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Publication. A county probate court shall annually publish on the court's publicly
accessible website the value described in subsection 1, paragraph A, including the
adjustment for inflation.
Page 1 - 132LR1977(02)